Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF862.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 331.755, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 331.755 Prohibited actions. 1. A county attorney shall not: 1. a. Accept a fee or reward from or on behalf of a person for services rendered in a prosecution or the conduct of official business. 2. b. Engage directly or indirectly as an attorney or an agent for a party other than the state or the county in an action or proceeding arising in the county which that is based upon substantially the same facts as a prosecution or proceeding which that has been commenced or prosecuted by the county attorney in the name of the state or the county. This prohibition also applies to the members of a law firm with which the county attorney is associated. 3. c. Receive assistance from another attorney who is interested in any civil action in which a recovery is asked based upon matters involved in a criminal prosecution commenced or prosecuted by the county attorney. House File 862, p. 2 2. A board of supervisors may, with a majority vote of the board, obtain outside counsel to represent the board of supervisors or any other county official. Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 862, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor